Hawaii statutes.
§586-10 Copy to law enforcement agency.
(a) Any order for protection granted pursuant to this chapter shall be
transmitted by the clerk of the court within twenty-four hours to the
appropriate county police department.

(b) Each county police department shall make
available to other law enforcement officers in the same county, through a
system for verification, information as to the existence and status of any
order for protection issued pursuant to this chapter. [L 1982, c 123, pt of §2;
am L 2000, c 186, §5]

Case Notes

Pursuant to this chapter, absent special circumstances, the
family court should not be involved in any stage of the prosecution of an
allegation of a knowing or intentional violation of a protective order by an
adult person, including the stage where the allegations are referred to the
police or the prosecutor, other than to simply advise interested parties that
the proper place to present such allegations is to the police or the
prosecutor, not to the family court. 99 H. 363 (App.), 55 P.3d 856.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next